District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.62

Reduction of stated capital — Limitations; paid-in surplus.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 206, ch. 269, § 62
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.62.
1981 Ed., § 29-362.
1973 Ed., § 29-925a.